incubator/apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="r/ish__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ish</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hym</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hyt</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ish</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'ee</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ooin</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oo</l>
          <r>ish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/oish__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oish</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oym</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oyd</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oish</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hymbee</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oee</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oin</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hymbiu</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eue</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hymboo</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oue</l>
          <r>oish<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="v/eih__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eih</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oym</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oyd</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eih</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oee</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oin</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eue</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oue</l>
          <r>eih<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="as__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Determiners -->
    
    <pardef n="shoh__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nyn__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/yn__det">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>yn<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>yn<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>yn</l>
          <r>yn<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>yn<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="rish"><i>r</i><par n="r/ish__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="roish"><i>r</i><par n="r/oish__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="veih"><i>v</i><par n="v/eih__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="yn"><i/><par n="/yn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="shoh"><i>shoh</i><par n="shoh__det"/></e>
    <e lm="shen"><i>shen</i><par n="shoh__det"/></e>
    <e lm="shid"><i>shid</i><par n="shoh__det"/></e>
    <e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dty"><i>dty</i><par n="e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nyn"><i>nyn</i><par n="nyn__det"/></e>
    <e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="as__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="agh"><i>agh</i><par n="as__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ny"><i>ny</i><par n="as__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ga"><i>ga</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tra"><i>tra</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="derrey"><i>derrey</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dy"><i>dy</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="nagh"><i>nagh</i><par n="ga__cnjsub"/></e>
